Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE H. PARKING, TOWING, AND STORAGE OF VEHICLES

CHAPTER 681. PRIVILEGED PARKING

Sec. 681.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) "Disability" means a condition in which a person has:

(A) mobility problems that substantially impair the person's ability to ambulate;

(B) visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with correcting lenses; or

(C) visual acuity of more than 20/200 but with a limited field of vision in which the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle of 20 degrees or less.

(3) "Disabled parking placard" means a placard issued under Section 681.002.

(4) "International symbol of access" means the symbol adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the Disabled.

(5) "Mobility problem that substantially impairs a person's ability to ambulate" means that the person:

(A) cannot walk 200 feet without stopping to rest;

(B) cannot walk without the use of or assistance from an assistance device, including a brace, a cane, a crutch, another person, or a prosthetic device;

(C) cannot ambulate without a wheelchair or similar device;

(D) is restricted by lung disease to the extent that the person's forced respiratory expiratory volume for one second, measured by spirometry, is less than one liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than 60 millimeters of mercury on room air at rest;

(E) uses portable oxygen;

(F) has a cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or Class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association;

(G) is severely limited in the ability to walk because of an arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;

(H) has a disorder of the foot that, in the opinion of a person licensed to practice podiatry in this state or in a state adjacent to this state, limits or impairs the person's ability to walk; or

(I) has another debilitating condition that, in the opinion of a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state or a state adjacent to this state, or authorized by applicable law to practice medicine in a hospital or other health facility of the Veterans Administration, limits or impairs the person's ability to walk.

(6) "Podiatry" has the meaning assigned by Section 202.001, Occupations Code.

(7) "Stand" or "standing" means to halt an occupied or unoccupied vehicle, other than temporarily while receiving or discharging passengers.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.156(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1172, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1325, Sec. 19.08(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2P.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 681.002. DISABLED PARKING PLACARD. (a) The department shall provide for the issuance of a disabled parking placard to a person with a disability.

(b) A disabled parking placard must be two-sided and hooked and include on each side:

(1) the international symbol of access, which must be at least three inches in height, be centered on the placard, and be:

(A) white on a blue shield for a placard issued to a person with a permanent disability; or

(B) white on a red shield for a placard issued to a person with a temporary disability;

(2) an identification number;

(3) an expiration date at least three inches in height; and

(4) the seal or other identification of the department.

(c) The department shall furnish the disabled parking placards to each county assessor-collector.

(d) A disabled parking placard must bear a hologram designed to prevent the reproduction of the placard or the production of a counterfeit placard.

(e) In addition to the expiration date included on a disabled parking placard under Subsection (b), the expiration date must be indicated on the placard by a month and year hole-punch system.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1362, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 681.003. PARKING PLACARD APPLICATION. (a) An owner of a motor vehicle regularly operated by or for the transportation of a person with a disability may apply for a disabled parking placard.

(b) An application for a disabled parking placard must be:

(1) on a form furnished by the department;

(2) submitted to the county assessor-collector of the county in which the person with the disability:

(A) resides; or

(B) is seeking medical treatment; and

(3) accompanied by a fee of $5 if the application is for a temporary placard.

(c) Subject to Subsections (e) and (f), the first application must be accompanied by a notarized written statement or written prescription of a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state or a state adjacent to this state, or authorized by applicable law to practice medicine in a hospital or other health facility of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, certifying and providing evidence acceptable to the department that the person making the application or on whose behalf the application is made is legally blind or has a mobility problem that substantially impairs the person's ability to ambulate. The statement or prescription must include a certification of whether the disability is temporary or permanent and information acceptable to the department to determine the type of disabled parking placard for which the applicant is eligible. The department shall determine a person's eligibility based on evidence provided by the applicant establishing legal blindness or mobility impairment.

(d) Information concerning the name or address of a person to whom a disabled parking placard is issued or in whose behalf a disabled parking placard is issued is confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(e) If a first application for a disabled parking placard under this section is made by or on behalf of a person with:

(1) a mobility problem caused by a disorder of the foot, the notarized written statement or written prescription required by Subsection (c) may be issued by a person licensed to practice podiatry in this state or a state adjacent to this state; or

(2) a disability caused by an impairment of vision as provided by Section 681.001(2), the notarized written statement or written prescription required by Subsection (c) may be issued by a person licensed to engage in the practice of optometry or the practice of therapeutic optometry in this state or a state adjacent to this state.

(f) This subsection applies only to the first application for a disabled parking placard submitted by a person. The notarized written statement or prescription may be issued by:

(1) a person acting under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician in conformance with Subchapter B, Chapter 157, Occupations Code; or

(2) a physician assistant licensed to practice in this state acting as the agent of a licensed physician under Section 204.202(e), Occupations Code.

(g) In this section, "practice of optometry" and "practice of therapeutic optometry" have the meanings assigned by Section 351.002, Occupations Code.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.156(b); Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1172, Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1362, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 531 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (S.B. 1984), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(65), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1291 (H.B. 2080), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 128, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 736 (H.B. 643), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 681.0031. APPLICANT'S IDENTIFICATION. (a) The applicant shall include on the application the applicant's:

(1) driver's license number or the number of a personal identification card issued to the applicant under Chapter 521;

(2) military identification number; or

(3) driver's license number of a driver's license issued by another state or country if the applicant is not a resident of this state and is seeking medical treatment in this state.

(b) The county assessor-collector shall record on any disabled parking placard issued to the applicant the following information in the following order:

(1) the county number assigned by the comptroller to the county issuing the placard;

(2) the first four digits of the applicant's driver's license number, personal identification card number, or military identification number; and

(3) the applicant's initials.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 473, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 231 (H.B. 1781), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 129, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 681.0032. ISSUANCE OF DISABLED PARKING PLACARDS TO CERTAIN INSTITUTIONS. (a) The department shall provide for the issuance of disabled parking placards described by Section 681.002 for a van or bus operated by an institution, facility, or residential retirement community for the elderly in which a person described by Section 504.201(a) resides, including an institution licensed under Chapter 242, Health and Safety Code, and a facility licensed under Chapter 246 or 247 of that code.

(b) The application for a disabled parking placard must be made in the manner provided by Section 681.003(b) and be accompanied by a written statement signed by the administrator or manager of the institution, facility, or retirement community certifying to the department that the institution, facility, or retirement community regularly transports, as a part of the services that the institution, facility, or retirement community provides, one or more persons described by Section 504.201(a) who reside in the institution, facility, or retirement community. The department shall determine the eligibility of the institution, facility, or retirement community on the evidence the applicant provides.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 513, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(c), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 681.004. ISSUANCE OF PARKING PLACARD; EXPIRATION. (a) A person with a permanent disability may receive:

(1) two disabled parking placards, if the person does not receive a set of special license plates under Section 504.201;

(2) one disabled parking placard, if the person receives a set of special license plates under Section 504.201; or

(3) two disabled parking placards, if the person receives two sets of special license plates under Section 504.202(b-1).

(b) A person with a temporary disability may receive two disabled parking placards.

(c) A disabled parking placard issued to a person with a permanent disability:

(1) is valid for:

(A) four years for a resident of this state; and

(B) six months for a person who is not a resident of this state; and

(2) shall be replaced or renewed on request of the person to whom the initial card was issued without presentation of evidence of eligibility.

(d) A disabled parking placard issued to a person with a temporary disability expires after the period set by the department and may be renewed at the end of that period if the disability remains as evidenced by a physician's statement or prescription submitted as required for a first application under Section 681.003(c).

(e) The department shall include with each disabled parking placard a document that provides:

(1) information on laws governing parking for persons with disabilities; and

(2) instructions for reporting alleged violations of this chapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(d), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 2105), Sec. 2, eff. May 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 130, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 3163), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 681.005. DUTIES OF COUNTY ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. Each county assessor-collector shall send to the department each fee collected under Section 681.003, to be deposited in the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund to defray the cost of providing the disabled parking placard.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 242, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 66, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 681.006. PARKING PRIVILEGES: PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES. (a) Subject to Section 681.009(e), a vehicle may be parked for an unlimited period in a parking space or area that is designated specifically for persons with physical disabilities if:

(1) the vehicle is being operated by or for the transportation of a person with a disability; and

(2) there are:

(A) displayed on the vehicle special license plates issued under Section 504.201; or

(B) placed on the rearview mirror of the vehicle's front windshield a disabled parking placard.

(b) The owner of a vehicle is exempt from the payment of a fee or penalty imposed by a governmental unit for parking at a meter if:

(1) the vehicle is being operated by or for the transportation of a person with a disability; and

(2) there are:

(A) displayed on the vehicle special license plates issued under Section 504.201; or

(B) placed on the rearview mirror of the vehicle's front windshield a disabled parking placard.

(c) The exemption provided by Subsection (b) or (e) does not apply to a fee or penalty:

(1) imposed by a branch of the United States government; or

(2) imposed by a governmental unit for parking at a meter, in a parking garage or lot, or in a space located within the boundaries of a municipal airport.

(d) This section does not permit a vehicle to be parked at a time when or a place where parking is prohibited.

(e) A governmental unit may provide by ordinance or order that the exemption provided by Subsection (b) also applies to payment of a fee or penalty imposed by the governmental unit for parking in a parking garage or lot or in a space with a limitation on the length of time for parking.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.156(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 804, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1362, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(e), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 681.007. PARKING PRIVILEGES: VEHICLES DISPLAYING INTERNATIONAL SYMBOL OF ACCESS. A vehicle may be parked and is exempt from the payment of a fee or penalty in the same manner as a vehicle that has displayed on the vehicle special license plates issued under Section 504.201 or a disabled parking placard as provided by Section 681.006 if there is displayed on the vehicle a license plate or placard that:

(1) bears the international symbol of access; and

(2) is issued by a state or by a state or province of a foreign country to the owner or operator of the vehicle for the transportation of a person with a disability.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(f), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 681.008. PARKING PRIVILEGES: CERTAIN VETERANS AND MILITARY AWARD RECIPIENTS. (a) A vehicle may be parked for an unlimited period in a parking space or area that is designated specifically for persons with physical disabilities if:

(1) the vehicle:

(A) displays special license plates issued under Section 504.202(b-1); and

(B) is being operated by or for the transportation of the person to whom the plates were issued; or

(2) the vehicle displays license plates issued by another state of the United States that indicate on the face of the license plates that the owner or operator of the vehicle is a disabled veteran of the United States armed forces.

(a-1) A vehicle described by Subsection (a) may be parked for an unlimited period in a parking space or area that is designated specifically for persons with physical disabilities on the property of an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, regardless of whether a permit is generally required for the use of the space or area. An institution of higher education may require a vehicle described by Subsection (a) to display a parking permit issued by the institution specifically for the purpose of implementing this subsection, but may not charge a fee for the permit. This subsection does not entitle a person to park a vehicle described by Subsection (a) in a parking space or area that has not been designated specifically for persons with physical disabilities on the property of the institution if the vehicle has not been granted or assigned a parking permit required by the institution.

(a-2) Subsection (a-1) does not apply to a parking space or area located in:

(1) a controlled access parking facility if at least 50 percent of the number of parking spaces or areas designated specifically for persons with physical disabilities on the property of the institution of higher education are located outside a controlled access parking facility;

(2) an area temporarily designated for special event parking; or

(3) an area where parking is temporarily prohibited for health or safety concerns.

(b) A vehicle on which license plates described by Subsection (a)(2) or issued under Section 504.202, 504.308, 504.310, 504.315, 504.316, or 504.319 are displayed is exempt from the payment of a parking fee collected through a parking meter charged by a governmental authority other than a branch of the federal government, when being operated by or for the transportation of:

(1) the person who registered the vehicle under Section 504.202(a), 504.308, 504.310, 504.315, 504.316, or 504.319;

(2) a person described in Section 504.202(b) if the vehicle is registered under that subsection; or

(3) the owner or operator of a vehicle displaying license plates described by Subsection (a)(2).

(c) This section does not permit a vehicle to be parked at a time when or a place where parking is prohibited.

(d) A governmental unit may provide by ordinance or order that the exemption provided by Subsection (b) also applies to payment of a fee or penalty imposed by the governmental unit for parking in a parking garage or lot or in a space with a limitation on the length of time for parking.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 738, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1195, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1362, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 19.007, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(g), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 115 (H.B. 2020), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 319 (H.B. 618), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 319 (H.B. 618), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.017, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 339 (H.B. 2928), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 559), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 309 (H.B. 1514), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (S.B. 1061), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1010 (H.B. 2485), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 675 (H.B. 168), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 17.008, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 681.009. DESIGNATION OF PARKING SPACES BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OR PRIVATE PROPERTY OWNER. (a) A political subdivision or a person who owns or controls property used for parking may designate one or more parking spaces or a parking area for the exclusive use of vehicles transporting persons with disabilities.

(b) A political subdivision must designate a parking space or area by conforming to the standards and specifications adopted by the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation under Section 469.052, Government Code, relating to the identification and dimensions of parking spaces for persons with disabilities. A person who owns or controls private property used for parking may designate a parking space or area without conforming to those standards and specifications, unless required to conform by law.

(c) A political subdivision may require a private property owner or a person who controls property used for parking:

(1) to designate one or more parking spaces or a parking area for the exclusive use of vehicles transporting persons with disabilities; or

(2) to conform to the standards and specifications referred to in Subsection (b) when designating a parking space or area for persons with disabilities.

(d) The department shall provide at cost a design and stencil for use by a political subdivision or person who owns or controls property used for parking to designate spaces as provided by this section.

(e) Parking spaces or areas designated for the exclusive use of vehicles transporting persons with disabilities may be used by vehicles displaying a white on blue shield disabled parking placard, license plates issued under Section 504.201 or 504.202(b-1), or a white on red shield disabled parking placard.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1246, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 11362, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(h), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 357 (S.B. 251), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 3163), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 681.010. ENFORCEMENT. (a) A peace officer or a person designated by a political subdivision to enforce parking regulations may file a charge against a person who commits an offense under this chapter at a parking space or area designated as provided by Section 681.009.

(b) A security officer commissioned under Chapter 1702, Occupations Code, and employed by the owner of private property may file a charge against a person who commits an offense under this chapter at a parking space or area designated by the owner of the property as provided by Section 681.009.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.840, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 681.0101. ENFORCEMENT BY CERTAIN APPOINTED PERSONS. (a) A political subdivision may appoint a person to have authority to file a charge against a person who commits an offense under this chapter.

(b) A person appointed under this section must:

(1) be a United States citizen of good moral character who has not been convicted of a felony;

(2) take and subscribe to an oath of office that the political subdivision prescribes; and

(3) successfully complete a training program of at least four hours in length developed by the political subdivision.

(c) A person appointed under this section:

(1) is not a peace officer;

(2) has no authority other than the authority applicable to a citizen to enforce a law other than this chapter; and

(3) may not carry a weapon while performing duties under this section.

(d) A person appointed under this section is not entitled to compensation for performing duties under this section or to indemnification from the political subdivision or the state for injury or property damage the person sustains or liability the person incurs in performing duties under this section.

(e) The political subdivision and the state are not liable for any damage arising from an act or omission of a person appointed under Subsection (a) in performing duties under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.156(d), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 681.011. OFFENSES; PRESUMPTION. (a) A person commits an offense if:

(1) the person stands a vehicle on which are displayed license plates issued under Section 504.201 or 504.202(b-1) or a disabled parking placard in a parking space or area designated specifically for persons with disabilities by:

(A) a political subdivision; or

(B) a person who owns or controls private property used for parking as to which a political subdivision has provided for the application of this section under Subsection (f); and

(2) the standing of the vehicle in that parking space or area is not authorized by Section 681.006, 681.007, or 681.008.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person stands a vehicle on which license plates issued under Section 504.201 or 504.202(b-1) are not displayed and a disabled parking placard is not displayed in a parking space or area designated specifically for individuals with disabilities by:

(1) a political subdivision; or

(2) a person who owns or controls private property used for parking as to which a political subdivision has provided for the application of this section under Subsection (f).

(c) A person commits an offense if the person stands a vehicle so that the vehicle blocks an architectural improvement designed to aid persons with disabilities, including an access aisle or curb ramp.

(d) A person commits an offense if the person lends a disabled parking placard issued to the person to a person who uses the placard in violation of this section.

(e) In a prosecution under this section, it is presumed that the registered owner of the motor vehicle is the person who left the vehicle standing at the time and place the offense occurred.

(f) A political subdivision may provide that this section applies to a parking space or area for persons with disabilities on private property that is designated in compliance with the identification requirements referred to in Section 681.009(b).

(f-1) It is not a defense to prosecution for an offense under Subsection (a) or (b) that the parking space or area designated specifically for persons with disabilities is not designated in compliance with the standards and specifications referred to in Section 681.009(b) if the parking space or area is generally in compliance with those standards and specifications and is clearly distinguishable as being designated specifically for persons with disabilities.

(f-2) A peace officer may issue a warning but may not issue a citation for an offense under Subsection (a) or (b) to a person who stands a vehicle in a parking space or area designated specifically for persons with disabilities that does not have a parking space identification sign identifying the parking space in accordance with the requirements of the standards and specifications referred to in Section 681.009(b).

(g) Except as provided by Subsections (h)-(k), an offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $500 or more than $750.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 4

(h) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted one time of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $550 or more than $800; and

(2) 10 hours of community service.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1336 (S.B. 52), Sec. 1

(h) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted one time of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $500 or more than $800; and

(2) 10 hours of community service.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 4

(i) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted two times of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $550 or more than $800; and

(2) not less than 20 or more than 30 hours of community service.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1336 (S.B. 52), Sec. 1

(i) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted two times of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $550 or more than $800; and

(2) 20 hours of community service.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 4

(j) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted three times of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $800 or more than $1,100; and

(2) 50 hours of community service.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1336 (S.B. 52), Sec. 1

(j) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted three times of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $800 or more than $1,100; and

(2) 30 hours of community service.

(k) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has been previously convicted four times of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by a fine of $1,250 and 50 hours of community service.

(l) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) stands a vehicle on which are displayed license plates issued under Section 504.201 or 504.202(b-1) or a disabled parking placard in a parking space or area for which this chapter creates an exemption from payment of a fee or penalty imposed by a governmental unit;

(2) does not have a disability;

(3) is not transporting a person with disability; and

(4) does not pay any applicable fee related to standing in the space or area imposed by a governmental unit or exceeds a limitation on the length of time for standing in the space or area.

(m) Subsections (n) and (o) apply only to a person who commits an offense under Subsection (b) when the vehicle:

(1) displays special license plates issued under Section 504.202 other than special license plates issued under Section 504.202(b-1); and

(2) does not display a disabled parking placard.

(n) Notwithstanding Subsections (g)-(k), an offense described by Subsection (m) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $25 or more than $200 or not more than 10 hours of community service, except that:

(1) if the person has previously been convicted one time of an offense described by Subsection (m) or received a dismissal under Subsection (o), the offense is punishable by:

(A) a fine of not less than $200 or more than $400; or

(B) not less than 10 hours or more than 20 hours of community service; and

(2) if the person has previously been convicted two times of an offense described by Subsection (m) or if the person has previously received a dismissal under Subsection (o) and previously been convicted one time of an offense described by Subsection (m), the offense is punishable by:

(A) a fine of not less than $400 or more than $750; or

(B) not less than 20 hours or more than 30 hours of community service.

(o) The court shall dismiss a charge for an offense described by Subsection (m) if the person:

(1) has not been previously convicted of an offense described by that subsection;

(2) has not previously received a dismissal under this subsection; and

(3) submits an application for a specialty license plate that includes the symbol described by Section 504.201(f) within six months after the date the person was charged with the offense.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.156(e), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 738, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1362, Sec. 6, 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 595, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1325, Sec. 19.08(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(i), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 357 (S.B. 251), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 3095), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1336 (S.B. 52), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 6, eff. January 1, 2022.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 1633), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (S.B. 904), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 681.0111. MANUFACTURE, SALE, POSSESSION, OR USE OF COUNTERFEIT OR ALTERED PLACARD. (a) A person commits an offense if, without the department's authorization, the person:

(1) manufactures, sells, or possesses a placard that is deceptively similar to a disabled parking placard; or

(2) alters a genuine disabled parking placard.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly parks a vehicle displaying a counterfeit or altered placard in a parking space or area designated specifically for persons with disabilities.

(c) An offense under Subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor. An offense under Subsection (b) is a Class C misdemeanor.

(d) For purposes of this section, a placard is deceptively similar to a disabled parking placard if the placard is not a genuine disabled parking placard but a reasonable person would presume that it is a genuine disabled parking placard.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 400, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 756 (H.B. 1473), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 756 (H.B. 1473), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 681.012. SEIZURE AND REVOCATION OF PLACARD. (a) A law enforcement officer who believes that an offense under Section 681.011(a) or (d) has occurred in the officer's presence shall seize any disabled parking placard involved in the offense. Not later than 48 hours after the seizure, the officer shall determine whether probable cause existed to believe that the offense was committed. If the officer does not find that probable cause existed, the officer shall promptly return each placard to the person from whom it was seized. If the officer finds that probable cause existed, the officer, not later than the fifth day after the date of the seizure, shall destroy the placard and notify the department.

(a-1) A peace officer may seize a disabled parking placard from a person who operates a vehicle on which a disabled parking placard is displayed if the peace officer determines by inspecting the person's driver's license, personal identification certificate, or military identification that the disabled parking placard does not contain the first four digits of the driver's license number, personal identification certificate number, or military identification number and the initials of:

(1) the person operating the vehicle;

(2) the applicant on behalf of a person being transported by the vehicle; or

(3) a person being transported by the vehicle.

(a-2) A peace officer shall destroy a seized placard and notify the department.

(b) On seizure of a placard under Subsection (a) or (a-1), a placard is revoked. A person from whom the placard was seized may apply for a new placard by submitting an application under Section 681.003.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1353, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1336 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 243, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 131, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 153 (H.B. 1790), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 681.013. DISMISSAL OF CHARGE; FINE. (a) In this section, "working day" means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a holiday on which county offices are closed.

(b) The court shall:

(1) dismiss a charge for an offense under Section 681.011(b)(1) if:

(A) the vehicle displayed a disabled parking placard that was not valid as expired;

(B) the defendant remedies the defect by renewing the expired disabled parking placard within 20 working days from the date of the offense or before the defendant's first court appearance date, whichever is later; and

(C) the disabled parking placard has not been expired for more than 60 days; and

(2) assess a reimbursement fee not to exceed $20 when the charge has been remedied.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b)(1)(C), the court may dismiss a charge of unlawfully parking a vehicle in a space designated specifically for persons with disabilities, if at the time of the offense the defendant's vehicle displays a disabled parking placard that has been expired for more than 60 days.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 298 (H.B. 400), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.75, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.76, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2021.